Idaho, session 2026, H0958.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 2, Title 56, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 56-204C, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
56-204C. IDAHO CHILD CARE PROGRAM -- INCOME ELIGIBILITY. A family with
a countable income at or below one hundred seventy-five percent (175%) of the
federal poverty level at the time of application shall meet the income eli-
gibility requirements for child care assistance through the Idaho child care
program.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.